Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF482.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1291YH (3) 91 ll/jh H.F. 482 Section 1. Section 562B.10, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. Rental agreements shall be for a term of one year unless 3 otherwise specified in the rental agreement. Rental agreements 4 shall be canceled by at least ninety daysâ written notice 5 given by either party. A landlord shall not cancel a rental 6 agreement unless the tenant has materially violated the rental 7 agreement and shall not cancel a rental agreement solely for 8 the purpose of making the tenantâs mobile home space available 9 for another mobile home. 10 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to rental 11 agreements entered into or renewed on or after the effective 12 date of this Act. 13